Massachusetts, session 194th, H4159.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 28A of chapter 140D of the General Laws, is amended by striking out, in line 7-
9, the words “(2) No seller in any sales transaction may impose a surcharge on a cardholder who 
elects to use a credit card in lieu of payment by cash, check or similar means." and replace it with 
the following words: "(2) A seller in any sales transaction may impose a surcharge of one half of 
the processing fee on a cardholder who elects to use a credit card or debit card in lieu of payment 
by cash, check or similar means. The charging of the surcharge fee shall be clearly stated on the 
bill or invoice prior to payment."